Utah statutes.
63G-2-602.   Disclosure to subject of records -- Context of use.

When providing records under Subsection 63G-2-202(1) or when providing public records about an individual to the persons specified in Subsection 63G-2-202(1), a governmental entity shall, upon request, disclose the context in which the record is used.

